Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 6

Police

6-21-601. Appointment.

The city manager shall appoint a chief of police and such patrol officers and other members of the police force as may be provided by ordinance.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 18, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a227; Code 1932, § 3625; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2128.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Collateral References.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection. 90 A.L.R.5th 273.

6-21-602. Duties.

It is the duty of the chief of police and the members of the police force to:

Preserve order in the city;

Protect the inhabitants and property owners therein from violence, crime, and all criminal acts;

Prevent the commission of crime, violations of law and of the city ordinances; and

Perform a general police duty, execute and return all processes, notices, and orders of the mayor, city manager, city attorney, and recorder, and all other processes, notices, and orders as provided in this charter or by ordinance.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 18, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a228; Code 1932, § 3626; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2129.

Law Reviews.

Policing the Police: Clarifying the Test for Holding the Government Liable Under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 and the State-Created Danger Theory, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 165 (2001).

6-21-603. Emergency assistance to police.

In time of riot or other emergency, the mayor or city manager shall have power to summon any number of inhabitants to assist the police force.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 18, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a229; Code 1932, § 3627; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2130.

6-21-604. Duties in prosecution of violations.

Members of the police force, whenever necessary for the purpose of enforcing the ordinances of the city, shall procure the issuance of warrants, serve the same, and appear in the city courts as prosecutors, relieving complaining citizens insofar as practical of the burden of instituting cases involving the violation of city ordinances; but this section shall not be construed to relieve any person from the duty of appearing in court and testifying in any case.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 18, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a230; Code 1932, § 3628; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2131.